Alabama, session 2026rs, SB353.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
Alyssa's Law.
Section 2. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) EMPLOYEE. An employee of the State Department of
Education, any local board of education, or any public charter
school who has access to students during the school day. This
term includes, but is not limited to, teachers,
administrators, administrative staff, custodial staff,
maintenance staff, cafeteria staff, nurses, counselors, media
specialists, coaches, and bus drivers.
(2) GOVERNING BODY. Each local board of education and
the governing body of each public charter school.
(3) MOBILE EMERGENCY RAPID RESPONSE SYSTEM. A
school-issued device that shall be wearable or in the personal
possession of the individual which, upon activation: (i)
immediately connects directly to the locally serving public
safety answering point; and (ii) provides accurate location
information to the room and floor level inside the facility
and to specific areas that are part of school grounds
including, but not limited to, parking lots, playgrounds, and
athletic fields.
(4) PUBLIC SAFETY ANSWERING POINT. The same meaning as
Section 11-98-1, Code of Alabama 1975.
(b)(1) No later than October 1, 2030, and subject to
annual dedicated school safety funds, each governing body
shall:
Page 2

shall:
SB353 INTRODUCED
a. Adopt a policy designating which employees in the
corresponding school system will be equipped with a mobile
emergency rapid response system and when that system must be
worn or kept in the personal possession of the individual; and
b. Equip each designated employee with a mobile
emergency rapid response system. When activated by an
employee, the system must immediately connect to school system
or school emergency services and the local public safety
answering point.
(2) Each governing body shall provide regular training
to employees on the use of the mobile emergency rapid response
system used by the school.
(c) The State Superintendent of Education shall develop
a list of approved vendors from which each governing body may
purchase approved mobile emergency rapid response systems.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, each governing body may use funding from any of the
following sources to comply with this section:
(1) The K-12 Capital Grant Program created pursuant to
Section 29-4-51, Code of Alabama 1975.
(2) The Education Trust Fund Advancement and Technology
Fund created pursuant to Section 29-9-4, Code of Alabama 1975.
(3) The School Security and Fire Safety Fund created
pursuant to Section 16-22B-3, Code of Alabama 1975.
(4) Any other available funds or funding sources.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3